Connecticut, session 2026, SB00385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 2-56 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The legislative commissioners shall:
[(a)] (1) Collect and compare the laws of this and other states
pertaining to any subject upon which they are requested to report by the
Governor or any committee or member of the General Assembly;
[(b)] (2) Collect upon request of the General Assembly all available
information relating to any matter which is the subject of proposed
legislation by the General Assembly;
[(c)] (3) Prepare or advise in the preparation of any bill or resolution
when requested to do so by the Governor or any member of the General
Assembly;
[(d)] (4) Upon request of the Governor, advise the Governor
concerning any bill which has been passed by the General Assembly and
has been or is to be presented to the Governor for his approval or
disapproval;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 385
[(e) Before any bill is favorably reported to either branch of the
General Assembly, either commissioner shall approve its form and note
his certification to such effect on such bill. If such commissioner
disapproves of the form of any bill submitted to him, he shall return
such bill to the committee from which it was received with his
disapproval and the reasons therefor noted thereon. Either
commissioner shall, on request of the member introducing an
amendment, examine the same as to form and return it to the member
with his approval, or with his disapproval with the reasons therefor
noted thereon. After all amendments to any bill have been adopted by
either house of the General Assembly before final passage, such bill and
the amendments shall be immediately turned over to either
commissioner by the clerk of such house. Such commissioner shall
examine such bill, as amended, as to its form, shall cause the amended
sections of it to be reprinted as amended, unless reprinting is waived by
the majority and minority leaders of such house, and shall return it to
such clerk with his approval or disapproval, with the reasons therefor,
noted thereon. If such bill, as amended, is disapproved as to form, such
clerk shall call such disapproval to the attention of the General
Assembly. If any bill is amended during the last five session days, it
shall be so submitted to either commissioner but the amended sections
of it need not be reprinted. This subsection shall not apply to any
amendment adopted solely for the correction of clerical errors or errors
as to form or dates, except that a copy of any such amendment shall be
immediately transmitted to either commissioner by the clerk of the
house in which it is first adopted;]
[(f)] (5) Render such research and advisory services to the Joint
Committee on Legislative Management as said committee requests; and
[(g)] (6) Consolidate and codify all the statutes and public acts of the
state, and arrange and codify the same under chapter and sections with
headnotes, annotations and references to original text and to any
decisions of the Supreme Court interpreting the same, and revise such
volumes thereof as have become obsolete by reason of the number of
amendments thereto or related legislation subsequently enacted. One
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 385
copy of such consolidation and codification and of each revised volume
shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of the State.
(b) The legislative commissioners shall choose an appropriate title for
all bills. In the case of a bill to be favorably reported by a committee of
the General Assembly, any member of the committee may object to the
title of the bill prior to a committee vote to favorably report the bill, and
if the member and the legislative commissioners cannot agree on the bill
title, the title shall be "An Act Concerning Matters Related To" followed
by the name of the committee of cognizance. In the case of a bill on the
calendar of either house of the General Assembly, any member of such
house may object to the title of the bill prior to voting on the bill, and if
the member and the legislative commissioners cannot agree on the bill
title, the title shall be "An Act Concerning Matters Related To" followed
by the name of the committee of cognizance.
(c) Before any bill is favorably reported to either house of the General
Assembly, either commissioner shall approve its form and note the
commissioner's certification to such effect on such bill. If such
commissioner disapproves of the form of any bill submitted to such
commissioner, the commissioner shall return such bill to the committee
from which it was received with the commissioner's disapproval and
the reasons therefor noted thereon. Either commissioner shall, on
request of the member introducing an amendment, examine the same as
to form and return it to the member with the commissioner's approval
or disapproval, and in the case of a disapproval, with the reasons
therefor noted thereon. After all amendments to any bill have been
adopted by either house of the General Assembly before final passage,
such bill and the amendments shall be immediately turned over to either
commissioner by the clerk of such house. Such commissioner shall
examine such bill, as amended, as to its form, shall cause the amended
sections of it to be reprinted as amended, unless reprinting is waived by
the majority and minority leaders of such house, and shall return it to
such clerk with the commissioner's approval or disapproval, with the
reasons therefor, noted thereon. If such bill, as amended, is disapproved
as to form, such clerk shall call such disapproval to the attention of the
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 385
General Assembly. If any bill is amended during the last five session
days, it shall be so submitted to either commissioner but the amended
sections of it need not be reprinted. This subsection shall not apply to
any amendment adopted solely for the correction of clerical errors or
errors as to form or dates, except that a copy of any such amendment
shall be immediately transmitted to either commissioner by the clerk of
the house in which it is first adopted.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 2-56
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4